Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5155.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 5-1-16 of the General Laws in Chapter 5-1 entitled "Architects" is
hereby amended to read as follows:
5-1-16. Architects rendering assistance during disaster emergency — Immunity from
civil liability.
(a)(1) An architect or architectural firm, duly licensed to practice in Rhode Island under
this chapter, who or that voluntarily and without compensation provides architectural services at
the scene of a disaster emergency is not liable for any personal injury, wrongful death, property
damage, or other loss or damages caused by an act or omission of the architect or architectural firm
in performing the services.
(2) An architect or architectural firm, duly licensed to practice in Rhode Island under this
chapter, who or that voluntarily and without compensation provides architectural services at the
scene of a disaster emergency and all authorized disaster response workers who shall, in the course
of performing their duties as such, practice professional, architecture, mechanical, engineering or
other skill during a disaster emergency, in the absence of benefits provided by law, shall be entitled
to all rights in like manner as state employees under the provisions of chapters 29 through 38 of
title 28, and under the provisions of § 9-31-8.
(b) As used in this section, “disaster emergency” means a disaster emergency declared by
executive order or proclamation of the governor pursuant to chapter 15 of title 30.
(c) The immunity provided in subsection (a) of this section applies only to the practice of

architecture as defined in this chapter regarding an architectural service that:
(1) Concerns any building, structure, or system, whether publicly or privately owned, that
is identified pursuant to a disaster emergency executive order or proclamation;
(2) Relates to the structural integrity of the entire building, structure, or system, or any
portion of the structure or system, or to a nonstructural element of the structure or system, affecting
public safety; and
(3) Is rendered during the time in which a state of disaster emergency exists, as provided
in chapter 15 of title 30.
(d) The immunity granted by this section shall not apply to acts or omissions constituting
gross negligence or willful misconduct.
(e) In the event that the governor of Rhode Island declares a state disaster, all registered
architects with a National Council of Architectural Registration Boards (NCARB) certification will
be allowed to practice for a period of ninety (90) days from the date of the declared disaster.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000538/SUB A/3
========
LC000538/SUB A/3 - Page 2 of 3